Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE E. BENEFITS PAYABLE UNDER HEALTH COVERAGES

CHAPTER 1354. ELIGIBILITY FOR BENEFITS FOR ALZHEIMER'S DISEASE

Sec. 1354.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies only to a health benefit plan that:

(1) provides coverage for Alzheimer's disease; and

(2) is an individual or group policy, contract, certificate, or evidence of coverage that is delivered or issued for delivery in this state by an insurer or a group hospital service corporation operating under Chapter 842.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 1354.002. PROOF OF ORGANIC DISEASE. If a health benefit plan requires demonstrable proof of organic disease or other proof before the health benefit plan issuer will authorize payment of benefits for Alzheimer's disease, that proof requirement is satisfied by a clinical diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease made by a physician licensed in this state, including a history and physical, neurological, and psychological or psychiatric evaluations, and laboratory studies.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.